Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202559-1715
Seller-assisted marketing plan; securities excluded.

A seller-assisted marketing plan shall not include a security as defined by subdivision (14) of section 8-1101.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 15;

Laws 1993, LB 216, § 12;

Laws 1997, LB 335, § 13;

Laws 2025, LB251, § 30.